Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-2620
Tuition waiver; amount; continuing eligibility; requirements.

A state university, state college, or community college that has granted a tuition waiver under the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act shall waive one hundred percent of resident tuition charges remaining due after subtracting awarded federal financial aid grants and state scholarships and grants for the tuition waiver recipient during the time the recipient is enrolled. To remain eligible, such recipient must comply with all requirements of the institution for continued attendance and award of an associate degree or a baccalaureate degree.

Laws 2025, LB608, § 13.